Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201654-641.03
Breeding dog; microchip; identification.

Each
breeding dog shall be identified by the implantation of a microchip, and each
dog's health records shall accurately record the appropriate identification.
The department may by rule or regulation require identification of any dog
by tag, tattoo, or other method if the microchip system is determined to be
ineffective. A commercial dog breeder licensed prior to October 1, 2012, who
utilizes a method or methods of identification other than microchipping as
authorized by rule and regulation of the department prior to October 1, 2012,
may continue to utilize such method or methods.

Laws 2012, LB427, § 10.